District of Columbia statutes.
46-401.01

Marriages void ab initio — In general.

The following marriages are prohibited in the District of Columbia and shall be absolutely void ab initio, without being so decreed, and their nullity may be shown in any collateral proceedings, namely:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

Repealed.

(2A)

The marriage of a person with a person’s grandparent, grandparent’s spouse, spouse’s grandparent, parent’s sibling, parent, step-parent, spouse’s parent, child, spouse’s child, child’s spouse, sibling, child’s child, child’s child’s spouse, spouse’s child’s child, sibling’s child.

(3)

The marriage of any persons either of whom has been previously married and whose previous marriage has not been terminated by death or a decree of divorce.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1391, ch. 854, § 1283
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-9,§ 3(a), 56 DCR 3797
redesignated as § 1283a, Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-110,§ 2(a), 57 DCR 27
Proceedings to annul marriage, see §§ 16-903, 16-904.
This section is referenced in § 16-903, § 46-401, and § 46-405.01.
2001 Ed., § 46-401.
1981 Ed., § 30-101.
1973 Ed., § 30-101.
D.C. Law 18-9 repealed pars. (1) and (2); and added par. (2A).
Former § 46-401 was recodified as § 46-401.01 by D.C. Law 18-110, § 2(a).